Georgia statutes. 
Negligent use of a city or county owned motor vehicle. - In a wrongful death action by a decedent's estate and the decedent's children against the county sheriff, the sheriff's sovereign immunity was waived pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-92-2(a) because the claim of reckless disregard for proper law enforcement procedures in pursuing a fleeing suspect came within the ambit of a claim for negligent use of a city or county owned motor vehicle. Strength v. Lovett, 311 Ga. App. 35, 714 S.E.2d 723 (2011), cert. denied, No. S11C1794, 2011 Ga. LEXIS 979 (Ga. 2011).

Purchase of general liability insurance policy waived immunity for injuries from tar machine. - In a worker's suit alleging negligence on the part of a county with regard to the county allegedly failing to properly instruct and supervise the worker in the use of a portable tar kettle machine, the trial court erred by granting the county's motion for a judgment on the pleadings based on sovereign immunity as the worker sufficiently alleged that the machine was a vehicle as contemplated by O.C.G.A. § 33-24-51, which established a waiver of sovereign immunity if the county purchased liability insurance to cover damages and injuries arising from the use of motor vehicles under the county's management. Hewell v. Walton County, 292 Ga. App. 510, 664 S.E.2d 875 (2008).

Injured driver could establish extent of damages caused by collision. - Driver's employer's uninsured motorist (UM) coverage was available to the driver because the policy promised to pay sums the driver was "legally entitled to recover" from a UM, even though the driver had collided with a county vehicle and the county's partial sovereign immunity prevented the driver from establishing in a lawsuit that the driver was legally entitled to recover the full amount of the driver's damages from the county. FCCI Ins. Co. v. McLendon Enters., 297 Ga. 136, 772 S.E.2d 651 (2015).

Claim against sheriff's deputy barred. - Trial court erred in denying the defendants' motion to dismiss the deputy on the ground that the plaintiff's tort claim was barred by O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(a) because the deputy was not a governmental entity; rather, the deputy was an employee of the county sheriff's department, was on duty, and was driving a county-owned patrol vehicle when the accident that injured the plaintiff occurred; thus, the deputy was not subject to liability for the accident and the claims against the deputy were barred. Moats v. Mendez, 349 Ga. App. 811, 824 S.E.2d 808 (2019).

Cited in Weaver v. City of Statesboro, 288 Ga. App. 32, 653 S.E.2d 765 (2007); Bd. of Comm'rs v. Johnson, 311 Ga. App. 867, 717 S.E.2d 272 (2011); Primas v. City of Milledgeville, 296 Ga. 584, 769 S.E.2d 326 (2015); Cannon v. Oconee County, 353 Ga. App. 296, 835 S.E.2d 753 (2019).

36-92-3. No employee liability; parties to litigation; evidence; bar to further recovery.

Statute text

(a) Any local government officer or employee who commits a tort involving the use of a covered motor vehicle while in the performance of his or her official duties is not subject to lawsuit or liability therefor. Nothing in this chapter, however, shall be construed to give the local government officer or employee immunity from suit and liability if it is proved that the local government officer's or employee's conduct was not within the performance of his or her official duties.

(b) A person bringing an action against a local government entity under the provisions of this chapter shall name as a party defendant the local government entity for which the officer or employee was acting and shall not name the local government officer or employee individually. In the event that the local government officer or employee is individually named for an act for which the local government entity is liable under this chapter, the local government entity for which the local government officer or employee was acting shall be substituted as the party defendant.

(c) For the purpose of presenting evidence at the trial of a case brought under the waiver provisions of this chapter, a plaintiff calling as a witness the present or former local government officer or employee whose alleged tort forms the basis of the claim against the local government entity defendant shall be allowed to subject such witness to cross-examination.

(d) Subject to the provisions contained in Code Sections 51-1-32 through 51-1-34, a settlement or judgment in an action or settlement on a claim brought pursuant to this chapter constitutes a complete bar to any further action by the claimant against a local government officer or employee or the local government entity by reason of the same occurrence.

(e) This chapter shall not waive the workers' compensation exclusive remedy when local government officers or employees are injured on the job.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-92-3, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 3.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2002, in subsection (d), a comma was added following "51-1-34" and a comma was deleted following "or employee".

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Construction. - General Assembly in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3 does not eliminate the ability of a plaintiff to recover for his or her injuries but simply shifts the responsibility to pay damages in certain situations from the individual employee to the local government entity, which comports with the General Assembly's general authority to modify common law rights of action. DeLoach v. Elliott, 289 Ga. 319, 710 S.E.2d 763 (2011).

Claim against police officer barred. - Trial court did not err in granting a police officer summary judgment in the officer's individual capacity on the ground that the officer was protected from suit under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(a) because a driver brought a claim against the officer and a city pursuant to § 36-92-3, and the trial court granted summary judgment to the city; because the driver did not enumerate that decision, it was final and, pursuant to § 36-92-3(d), provided a "complete bar" to any future suit brought by the driver against the city or the employee and involving the tortious act at issue in the case. DeLoach v. Elliott, 289 Ga. 319, 710 S.E.2d 763 (2011).

Trial court properly concluded that O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3 barred the driver and the driver's spouse from recovering against the officer in the officer's official capacity and, thus, properly dismissed the officer from the case. Ray v. City of Griffin, 318 Ga. App. 426, 736 S.E.2d 110 (2012).

Claim against sheriff's deputy barred. - Summary judgment was properly granted to the deputy as the deputy was not subject to liability for the automobile accident, and the plaintiff's claims against the deputy were barred because the term "local government entity" included sheriffs' offices; any local government officer or employee who committed a tort involving the use of a covered motor vehicle while in the performance of the employee's official duties was not subject to lawsuit or liability; and the deputy was employed as a county sheriff's deputy and the deputy was driving a county-owned vehicle en route to the sheriff's office's evidence room where the deputy worked as an evidence custodian when the accident with the plaintiff occurred. Davis v. Morrison, 344 Ga. App. 527, 810 S.E.2d 649 (2018).

Trial court erred in denying the defendants' motion to dismiss the deputy on the ground that the plaintiff's tort claim was barred by O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(a) because the deputy was not a governmental entity; rather, the deputy was an employee of the county sheriff's department, was on duty, and was driving a county-owned patrol vehicle when the accident that injured the plaintiff occurred; thus, the deputy was not subject to liability for the accident and the claims against the deputy were barred. Moats v. Mendez, 349 Ga. App. 811, 824 S.E.2d 808 (2019).

County not vicariously liable for act of sheriff's deputy. - In an action by parents that was erroneously brought against a county arising out of a deputy sheriff's high-speed chase, because the deputy was employed by the sheriff rather than the county, the parents' argument that the parents could sue the county based upon the waiver of sovereign immunity for motor vehicle claims found in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 et seq. was rejected; the term "local government entity" in O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(b) had been interpreted to include sheriff's offices. Cannon v. Oconee County, 353 Ga. App. 296, 835 S.E.2d 753 (2019).

Construction with O.C.G.A. § 50-21-25. - Due to the nearly identical language between O.C.G.A. §§ 36-92-3 and 50-21-25, the General Assembly intended to provide immunity for municipal employees in the context of torts involving a covered motor vehicle, which is comparable to the immunity granted to state employees in the context of all torts, as long as the pertinent conditions have been satisfied; thus, by the passage of O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3, the legislature intended to foreclose all recovery against municipal employees for torts committed within the scope of employment and involving the use of a covered motor vehicle. DeLoach v. Elliott, 289 Ga. 319, 710 S.E.2d 763 (2011).

Government entity substituted as party. - Intent of O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3(b) is that the government entity should be substituted as a party to a suit whenever one of the entity's employees has committed "an act for which the local government entity is liable under this chapter;" the selected phrase is merely a description of when the government entity should replace the employee because if the government entity would not be liable under O.C.G.A. § 36-92-1 et seq., as when the employee committed the tort using an uncovered motor vehicle, then the government entity is not "liable under this chapter" and need not be substituted. DeLoach v. Elliott, 289 Ga. 319, 710 S.E.2d 763 (2011).

Employee acting within scope of employment. - Driver's argument that a city employee was acting outside the scope of employment at the time of an accident was without merit because the employee's act of crossing a private shopping center before pulling onto the road was not unlawful under O.C.G.A. § 40-6-20(e) (disregard of a traffic signal) or O.C.G.A. § 16-7-21(b)(1) (criminal trespass); the employee was, therefore, immune from suit and liability based on O.C.G.A. § 36-92-3. Guice v. Brown, 334 Ga. App. 199, 778 S.E.2d 823 (2015).

Cited in Hartley v. Agnes Scott College, 295 Ga. 458, 759 S.E.2d 857 (2014).

36-92-4. Regulation of settlement of actions against local government entities; exclusion of punitive and exemplary damages; rules of disclosure of documents; recovery against local governments; jurisdiction.

Statute text

(a) Local government entities may provide for the payment of claims, settlements and judgments, and their associated costs through any method including, but not limited to, self-insurance, use of a fund within the local government's budget for the payment of claims, the purchase of liability insurance, participation in an interlocal risk management agency organized pursuant to Chapter 85 of Title 36, or a combination thereof.

(b) No award for damages under this chapter shall include punitive or exemplary damages.

(c) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any document or information which pertains to the requesting or giving of legal advice or the disclosure of reports or evaluations of persons, including adjusters, assigned to evaluate and adjust claims concerning or pertaining to pending or potential litigation, settlement, claims, administrative proceedings, or other judicial actions brought or to be brought by or against a local government entity under this chapter shall be considered privileged and confidential and shall not be subject to disclosure until final disposition of a claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, upon filing a lawsuit pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 11 of Title 9 and any other law applicable to cases in litigation shall apply.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize an execution or levy against any local government entity's property or funds. Execution or levy against a local government entity's property or funds is expressly prohibited. However, nothing in this Code section shall bar the pursuit of any other remedies that exist to enforce a judgment under state law.

(e) Where policies of insurance or contracts of indemnity have not been purchased or entered into by a local government entity for the purposes of paying claims and judgments under this chapter, the fiscal year aggregate liability of any local government entity under this chapter shall not exceed any self-insurance or other reserve or fund established to pay claims arising out of this chapter. Where policies of insurance or contracts of indemnity have been purchased or entered into and the local government entity also self-insures or establishes another reserve or fund to pay claims arising out of this chapter, the fiscal year aggregate liability of any local government entity under this chapter shall not exceed such entity's policies of insurance or contracts of indemnity and the amount of any self-insurance or other reserve or fund established to pay claims arising out of this chapter. Any judgment obtained in excess of this limitation on annual aggregate liability shall not be void. Such excess judgments shall be paid by the local government entity no later than six months from the end of the local government entity's fiscal year in which the final judgment was entered. If there are multiple judgments, the judgments shall be paid in the order in which each final judgment was entered by the court following any appeals.

(f) The existence or amount of the waiver of immunity specified in Code Section 36-92-2 shall not be disclosed or suggested to the jury.

(g) As a condition of the waiver of sovereign immunity authorized by this chapter, all tort actions filed against a local government entity under this chapter, including any action filed against a local government entity as a joint tort-feasor, shall be brought in the state or superior court of the county wherein the local government entity resides.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-92-4, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 3; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 36/HB 942.)

36-92-5. Applicability.

Statute text

This chapter shall apply to all claims and causes of actions arising out of events occurring on or after January 1, 2005.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-92-5, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 579, § 3.)

——————————

CHAPTER 93

INFRASTRUCTURE DEVELOPMENT DISTRICTS

36-93-1 through 36-93-26.

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2007, p. 739, § 5/SB 200, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall only become effective on January 1, 2009, upon the ratification of a resolution at the November, 2008, state-wide general election that amends the Constitution so as to authorize the General Assembly to provide by general law for the creation and comprehensive regulation of infrastructure development districts. If such resolution is not so ratified, this Act shall not become effective and shall stand repealed in its entirety on January 1, 2009." The constitutional amendment proposed in Ga. L. 2007, p. 775/SR 309, was defeated in the general election on November 4, 2008.

——————————